California, session 20252026, AB1347.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) The state is facing unprecedented load growth coupled with increased pressures on affordability.(b) Although the Legislature, in 2023, enacted the Powering Up Californians Act (Article 14.5 (commencing with Section 930) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code), many jurisdictions continue to face energy constraints.(c) Delays in providing electricity, including service upgrades, are costly to local cities.(d) Many local jurisdictions face millions of dollars of lost revenue because of potential delays.(e) The state needs to look at alternative ways of providing safe and reliable electricity to hard-to-reach areas and customers.SEC. 2. Section 933.1 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:933.1. (a) (1) The Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development, in conjunction with the Independent System Operator, shall identify six electrical infrastructure modernization zones based on, at a minimum, all of the following indicators:(A) Need for increased economic development within the local jurisdiction.(B) Lack of electrical infrastructure and delays in providing timely electrification, or both.(C) Projected load growth in the local jurisdiction.(D) Need to build infrastructure with a minimum impact on ratepayers.(2) The six electrical infrastructure modernization zones identified pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include both of the following zones:(A) The high desert area, as defined by the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development in conjunction with the Independent System Operator.(B) The unincorporated area known as Altadena in the County of Los Angeles.(b) For electrical infrastructure modernization zones identified pursuant to subdivision (a), all of the following shall apply:(1) The commission and the Energy Commission shall recognize the electrical infrastructure modernization zones as load growth priority areas.(2) An electrical corporation that serves a customer within an electrical infrastructure modernization zone may work with the local jurisdiction to update its electrical load projections.(3) The commission shall authorize an electrical corporation that serves a customer within an electrical infrastructure modernization zone to do both of the following: (A) Expedite cost recovery pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 937.(B) Manage a microgrid, upon approval of the local jurisdiction. If the microgrid is not interconnected to the electrical grid, the electrical corporation may collect a fixed charge from a customer of the microgrid. If the electrical corporation is not able to manage the microgrid, a customer may contract with a microgrid provider for up to 10 years with a one-time 10-year renewal process.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that a special statute is necessary and that a general statute cannot be made applicable within the meaning of Section 16 of Article IV of the California Constitution because of the unique demand for adequate operational electrical infrastructure in the unincorporated area known as Altadena in the County of Los Angeles.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact subsequent legislation that would create, in partnership with the Governor’s Office of Business and Economic Development and the Independent System Operator, electric modernization zones in order to meet the electricity needs of high-growth economic areas throughout California, including, but not limited to, the high desert. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Public Utilities Commission, the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, and the Department of Fish and Wildlife would work to implement that subsequent legislation.